California statutes. Water Code
Notwithstanding Section 45100, whenever in any district (1) a report and recommendation as to a project, or a report as to a contract with the United States, has been adopted by the voters at an election held pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 42200) of this division, (2) an assessment to finance the project or the contract has been levied and assessed and remains unpaid in whole or in part, and (3) in the judgment of the board it is for the best interest of the district or the landowners therein to issue bonds for the purpose of obtaining money to pay the costs of the project, all or any part of the outstanding principal of direct assessment warrants heretofore or hereafter issued pursuant to Section 46381 for said project, or charges pursuant to the contract, the board may, by a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of its members, authorize the issuance of bonds in an amount not exceeding the amount of the assessment remaining unpaid, without calling or holding any special election pursuant to Section 45100 or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 45250) of this part.

This section shall apply to all districts, including any district in which a report and recommendation as to a project, or a report as to a contract with the United States, has been adopted at an election held at any time heretofore, and shall apply in the case of any assessment at any time heretofore or hereafter levied and assessed, if the assessment remains unpaid in whole or in part at the time of adoption of the resolution of the board authorizing the issuance of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45103.

If the district’s voters have approved a project pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 42200) and the project authorizes the issuance of revenue bonds for the purpose of carrying out the project, the board may, by a two-thirds vote of the board, adopt a resolution authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The district may sell the bonds at public or private sale. The resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall constitute the resolution required pursuant to Section 54387 of the Government Code. The district’s voters approval of the project shall constitute “the votes of a majority of all the voters voting” as that term is used in Section 54386 of the Government Code and no further vote of the voters shall be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 96.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bond Election [45250. - 45278.]



  ARTICLE 1. Notice [45250. - 45250.]

45250.

The notice of a special bond election shall state the aggregate face value of bonds proposed to be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election [45270. - 45278.]

45270.

Only holders of title to land which has been assessed as provided in this division shall be qualified to vote at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45271.

To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 57.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

45272.

A list of the ballots cast shall be made by the board of election, containing the name of each voter who has voted at the election, and if the ballot was cast by proxy also the name of the person casting it, and the number of votes cast by each voter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45273.

At the close of the polls the board of election shall at once proceed to canvass the votes and declare the result.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45274.

The board of election shall deliver a certificate showing the result and the number of votes cast for and against the issuing of the bonds to the county elections official of each county, and a duplicate to the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

45275.

The board of election shall deliver to the county elections official of each county all ballots cast at the election within that county and all documents and papers used at the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

45276.

The county elections officials of the respective counties shall immediately upon receipt of the ballots, papers, and documents from the board of election certify to the board of directors at its office a statement of the result of the election held in each of the counties with a statement of the number of votes for the proposition and opposed to the proposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 58.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

45277.

The board of directors shall certify in its minutes that the proposal to issue bonds has carried or has been defeated. The certificate shall state the vote cast throughout the entire district. A duplicate of the certificate shall be immediately transmitted to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45278.

Except as in this part specifically provided, the provisions of this division with reference to all matters pertaining to elections shall govern bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Bond Issuance [45400. - 45408.]

45400.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of the issuance of bonds, or if a resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds has been adopted and approved in accordance with Section 45102, the board shall cause bonds in the amount stated in the order calling the election or in such resolution, as the case may be, to be sold as herein provided and shall deliver the assessment list segregated as to affected counties to the treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

45401.

The treasurer shall place the proceeds of sale of any bonds sold to the credit of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

45402.

The board may divide the principal amount of any authorized issue of bonds into two or more series, and may fix different dates for the bonds of each series. When directed by resolution of the board, the treasurer shall sell the bonds or any series thereof for the best price obtainable, but in no event for less than 90 percent of the face value of the bonds and accrued interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

45403.

Before making a sale of bonds, notice shall be given by the treasurer by publication at least once a week for two successive weeks in the office county that he will sell a specified amount of bonds, and stating the day, hour, and place of sale, and asking sealed proposals for the purchase of any or all of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45404.

At the time appointed, the treasurer shall open the bids and award the bonds to the highest responsible bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45405.

The treasurer, upon written request of a majority of the directors, shall reject any or all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45406.

Sale and delivery of bonds by the treasurer is conclusive evidence that the sale was made upon due authority and notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45407.

Upon a sale of any district bonds, the treasurer may accept in payment, in whole or in part, outstanding warrants of the district at face value plus accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45408.

The bonds of any series of an authorized issue shall be equally and ratably secured with the bonds of any other series of such authorized issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Bond Terms [45550. - 45560.]

45550.

The bonds shall be in such denominations as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

45551.

The bonds shall be signed by the president and attested by the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45552.

The bonds shall be numbered consecutively in order of their maturity. If the bonds are issued in two or more series, each series shall be lettered in alphabetical order, and the bonds of each series shall be numbered consecutively in order of their maturity within such series.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

45553.

The bonds or any series thereof shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed 8 percent per year payable annually or semiannually as may be prescribed by the board at the time of the issuance of the bonds at the office of the treasurer and at any other place within the United States which may be designated by the board, upon the presentation of the proper coupons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

45554.

Coupons for each installment of interest shall be attached to the bonds and shall bear the facsimile signature of the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

45555.

The principal of the bonds or any series thereof shall be made payable on such dates, in such years and at such places as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

45556.

The bonds or any series thereof shall be payable within 40 years from their date, and not less than 10 percent of the aggregate face value of the bonds or any series thereof issued shall be payable within 15 years from their date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

45557.

The bonds shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

45558.

The interest coupons shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

45559.

When bonds are made callable, a statement to that effect shall be set forth on the face of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1137.)
-------------------------------------------

45560.

The board may determine to establish a bond reserve fund for the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds. Such a bond reserve fund may be established from the premium, if any, received upon the sale of the bonds or from tolls or charges levied pursuant to Section 43006, or from both such sources. Except as otherwise provided by the board in the resolution determining to establish a bond reserve fund, any moneys deposited in such a fund shall be used solely for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds in the event that other available moneys of the district are insufficient therefor. When all of the principal of and interest on the bonds have been paid, the balance of the money remaining in the bond reserve fund may be applied to any lawful purpose of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 56.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Additional Bonds [45700. - 45702.]

45700.

If any district having authorized the issuance of any bonds shall issue additional bonds based on another assessment, the dates of maturity of the additional bonds or any series thereof shall be such that the latest maturity thereof shall not exceed 50 years from their date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

45702.

All provisions of this part relative to the original issue of bonds shall apply to any additional bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Callable Bonds [45800. - 45804.]

45800.

A district may by resolution of its board adopted at or prior to the time of issuing any bonds then proposed to be issued, provide for the call and redemption prior to their fixed maturity of any of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1137.)
-------------------------------------------

45801.

Bonds may be made subject to redemption prior to their fixed maturity at such times and prices, and upon such terms and conditions as the board may determine and set forth in the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

45802.

Notice designating the bonds called for redemption shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the office county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1137.)
-------------------------------------------

45803.

The first publication of the redemption notice shall be not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days prior to the date fixed for redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1137.)
-------------------------------------------

45804.

If on the date fixed for redemption the district has provided funds available for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds called, interest on them ceases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1137.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Direct Assessment Warrants [45900. - 45932.]



  ARTICLE 1. Project and Government Contract Warrants [45900. - 45907.]

45900.

For the purpose of financing a district project or government contract which has been approved by the voters of the district, the board of directors may, by a two-thirds vote of its members, issue written obligations which may be denominated notes, certificates of indebtedness or warrants. The term “direct assessment warrants,” as used in this chapter, means such obligations, howsoever denominated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45901.

Direct assessment warrants shall be signed by the president and secretary in face amount not exceeding in the aggregate the cost of the project or government contract, exclusive of interest and amounts paid prior to the issuance of these warrants on the assessment levied to pay for said district project or government contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45902.

Direct assessment warrants shall be made payable in amounts and at the times corresponding substantially to the amounts and times of payment of the installments of the direct assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45903.

Direct assessment warrants shall bear interest at a rate to be fixed by the board at the time of sale thereof, not to exceed 7 percent per year, which interest may be made payable semiannually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

45904.

Coupons for the interest on these warrants may be attached to them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45905.

Direct assessment warrants may be made payable to any of the following:

(a) Bearer.

(b) Persons furnishing work, labor or material.

(c) The contractor if the work on the project is to be done under contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45906.

Direct assessment warrants may be sold by the district for not less than par at either public or private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45907.

Any surplus funds and any money held by a district in a sinking or depreciation fund may in the discretion of its board be invested in direct assessment warrants of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Advance Payment of Assessments [45920. - 45924.]

45920.

At any time before direct assessment warrants are issued, the amount of any assessment on any land, exclusive of interest and the 10 percent added for anticipated delinquencies, may be paid in money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45921.

Land on which the amount of the assessment has been paid pursuant to Section 45920 shall not be subject to the annual installments of the assessments levied for the purposes of the project or contract, but it shall be and remain liable for any assessments levied for operation and for any supplemental or additional assessments levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45922.

Any landowner who desires at any time to lessen or remove the lien upon his land of any direct assessment may deliver to the district treasurer for cancellation warrants payable out of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45923.

The board may require warrants delivered to lessen or remove an assessment lien to be substantially of the average maturities of the issue of warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45924.

The treasurer shall notify the board of the amount of the principal and interest due and to become due on the warrants delivered for cancellation. The board shall thereupon cause the proper cancellation and proper record and credit to be made against the assessment on the land of the person delivering the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Actions and Proceedings [45930. - 45932.]

45930.

All acts, proceedings, conclusions and findings of fact by a board of a district shall be conclusive except in an action or proceeding instituted within six months after the acts, proceedings, conclusions or findings were had or made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------

45931.

An action to determine the validity of any assessment or warrants may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

45932.

No irregularity or omission not affecting the substantial rights of the landowners within a district shall affect the validity of any act done or proceeding taken in relation to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. ASSESSMENTS [46000. - 47982.]



  CHAPTER 1. Preliminary Assessments [46000. - 46010.]

46000.

A preliminary assessment is an assessment levied by the board of an equal amount upon each acre of land in the district sufficient to pay all warrants issued by the department in accordance with this division, and to defray all other expenses as estimated by the board incurred and to be incurred for the general benefit of the district up to the time of the levy of assessments provided for in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46150) of this part, including expenses incurred prior to the organization of the district but in the judgment of the board properly
 incurred for the general benefit of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46001.

At its first regular meeting, or within 90 days thereafter, the board shall levy a preliminary assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46002.

The amounts required to be raised to pay warrants of the department and to pay expenses shall be separately stated in the resolution levying the preliminary assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46003.

In the event the first preliminary assessment is not sufficient, the board shall from time to time levy further preliminary assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46004.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the total of all preliminary assessments, exclusive of the amount assessed for the purpose of paying warrants of the department, shall not exceed fifty cents ($0.50) per acre.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46005.

If after the total amount raised by all preliminary assessments shall have been expended or its expenditure authorized, that amount is found to be insufficient to meet all expenses of the district, the directors may, in the manner provided in this chapter, levy additional preliminary assessments up to an amount not in excess of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per acre.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

46006.

Before levying any additional preliminary assessment the board shall pass a resolution declaring its intention so to do, and in the resolution appoint a time not less than two weeks nor more than four weeks from the date of the resolution when the matter of levying the additional preliminary assessment will be considered in open meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46007.

A copy of the resolution of intention shall be published once a week for at least two weeks before the time appointed by the board for the open meeting in a newspaper of general circulation in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46008.

At the time appointed for the open meeting by the board, it shall consider the matter of levying the additional preliminary assessment and hear any objection. At or after the meeting, the board may levy the additional assessment, if in its judgment the levy is in the best interests of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46009.

Every preliminary assessment is a lien upon the land affected until the full amount of the assessment is paid. The lien is prior to all other liens, except state, county, and municipal taxes and assessments, or taxes levied or assessed by or under statutory authority. The preliminary assessments shall bear interest at the rate of 7 percent per year and shall be collected in the same manner, together with the same penalties for delinquencies, as other assessments provided for in this division. Interest commences to run 30 days after filing of the assessment roll with the county treasurer of an affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

46010.

If, after a project has been completed, the board determines that an additional project would be for the benefit of the entire district, the board may, in the manner provided in this chapter, levy a supplemental preliminary assessment up to an amount not in excess of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per acre. The approval of the department on an assessment levied under this section and Section 42752 shall not be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2071.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Original Assessments to Finance Projects [46150. - 46382.]



  ARTICLE 1. Commissioners [46150. - 46156.]

46150.

If a district project is adopted as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 42500) of Part 5 of this division, the board shall appoint three commissioners, one of whom shall be a civil engineer and one shall have a practical knowledge of irrigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46151.

No commissioner shall have any interest in any land in the district either directly or indirectly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46152.

Each commissioner before entering upon his duties shall take and subscribe an oath that he is not in any manner interested directly or indirectly in any land in the district and that he will perform the duties of commissioner to the best of his ability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46153.

The commissioners shall be paid as compensation for the services rendered by them the sum, or sums, as the board fixes, which is a part of the cost of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 105.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46154.

Compensation to the commissioners shall be paid out of the funds of the district, which may be included in any bond issue authorized for the purposes of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 106.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46155.

The commissioners shall receive from the board a copy of the report with respect to the project adopted by the voters at the election held pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 42200) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

46156.

In lieu of the appointment of the three commissioners as provided in Section 46150, the board by resolution may appoint a civil engineer to apportion the costs of the project or to reassess the costs thereof as provided by this chapter; provided, however, that if a protest is filed with the board within 10 days of the adoption of the resolution by the owners of 10 percent or more of the assessed value of the land in any division of the district, or by the owners of 2 percent or more of the assessed value of all of the land in the district, the resolution
 shall not be effective and the three commissioners shall be appointed as provided by Section 46150. The civil engineer may be an employee of the district. In the event of an appointment, the term “commissioners” as used in this chapter shall refer to that engineer. In all other respects the proceedings of this chapter shall remain the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Apportionment of Costs [46175. - 46179.]

46175.

The commissioners appointed pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter shall assess the costs of the project, or in the event the board has divided the project into units of construction, the cost of the unit or units specified for immediate construction, upon the benefited land. In the event that the costs of the project are to be paid in part from the proceeds of a loan from the United States, the portion to be so paid may be separately assessed in the manner provided in Section 44031, and the portion of the costs of the project to be paid from other funds shall be assessed as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

46176.

The commissioners shall apportion the cost in accordance with the benefits that will accrue to each tract of land held in separate ownership by reason of the expenditures of the money and the completion of the project, or such units of it as have been specified for immediate construction. The assessment shall be payable in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46177.

If the project includes plans for the generation of electric power, the commissioners shall ascertain the total cost of all the properties which are necessary to be used in connection with the generation of electric power as set forth in the plan, and shall also ascertain what portion of the assessment of benefits to accrue to each tract consists of costs of the properties which are necessary to be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46178.

Where any tract of land consists of more than one section, the apportionment to that tract of land shall be made according to legal subdivisions or to other boundaries sufficient to identify the land in subdivisions not greater than one section in area. Any failure or defect in complying with this requirement shall not invalidate the apportionment or the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46179.

If the district project as adopted, as provided in Part 5 (commencing at Section 42200) of this division, provides that all of the costs of the project are to be borne by certain designated lands within the district and there is on file with the board a written stipulation or agreement executed and acknowledged by the owners of all of such designated lands wherein the landowners consent to an apportionment of all costs of the project on their lands in a particular manner, then all of such costs shall be apportioned by the commissioners in accordance with such stipulation or agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1136.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Assessment Rolls [46200. - 46210.]

46200.

The commissioners shall prepare and certify assessment rolls which shall contain:

(a) A description of each tract held in separate ownership by legal subdivisions, governmental surveys, or other boundaries sufficient to identify it. If any area composed of more than one tract held in separate ownership is not assessed because the land therein will not be benefited by the expenditure of the funds to be raised by the assessment, a description of the area as a whole without a description of each
 tract shall be sufficient.

(b) The number of acres in each tract.

(c) The name and address of the owner of each tract, if known, and if unknown, that fact. No mistake or error in the name of the owner or supposed owner of the property assessed, and no mistake in any other particular, shall render the assessment invalid.

(d) The rate per acre of the assessment upon each tract assessed, or if no assessment is made upon any tract or area composed of more than one tract, a statement of that fact.

(e) The rate per acre of the assessment upon each tract assessed for the costs of the properties that are necessary to be used in connection with the generating of electric power, or if no assessment of the costs is made upon any tract or area composed of more than
 one tract, a statement of that fact.

(f) The total amount of the assessment as computed.

(g) Any other statement which may be required by the board at the time of transmitting the plans and specifications and costs of the work for the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46201.

The roll shall be separately made for each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46202.

When completed, the rolls shall be accompanied by the written report of the commissioners setting out with particularity all the following:

(a) The exact nature and quantum of the benefits assessed, apportioned, and allocated to each tract of land in the district, in respect to:

(1) The right in and to stored surplus waters, and

(2) The right to store water in the reservoirs of the district, and

(3) Any drainage or
 reclamation work connected with the tract, and

(4) A statement, if such be the case, that the costs are apportioned in accordance with a stipulation or agreement of landowners as provided for by Section 46179.

(b) The portion of the assessment, if any, attributable to the cost of the properties which are necessary to be used in connection with the generation of electric power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1136.)
-------------------------------------------

46203.

In the report of the commissioners, land embraced within a comprehensive area or a political subdivision of the State may be referred to generally as land lying within the area or subdivision without further description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46205.

The commissioners shall transmit two copies of the rolls to the board. The board shall file one copy in its records and transmit to the county treasurer of each affected county that portion of the roll relating to land within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 117.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46206.

The board shall forthwith give notice of the filing of the assessment roll by publication at least once a week for two successive weeks in each affected county, and shall state therein the time within which objections to the roll may be filed with the board, which shall be not less than 20 days after the completion of publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46207.

The objections to any assesment shall be in writing, verified, and filed with the secretary of the board, and shall set forth the grounds of the objection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46208.

The verification shall be made by the affidavit of the objector or some other person familiar with the facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46209.

If no objections are filed with respect to a particular assessment roll, as provided in Sections 46206 and 46207, then upon the expiration of the time fixed by the board for the filing of objections the secretary of the board shall execute certificates in which he or she shall certify to the fact that no objections were so filed. The secretary of the board shall file one copy of the certificates with the county treasurer of each county in which lands appear on the assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 118.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46210.

Upon filing of the certificates of the secretary of the board as provided in Section 46209, the assessment roll and the assessments therein made shall be final and conclusive, and no action or defense shall ever be maintained attacking them in any respect, and the assessment roll shall be conclusive evidence before any court or tribunal that the assessment has been made and levied according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Hearings Before Adjustment Board [46225. - 46232.]

46225.

In the event objections are filed with respect to a particular assessment roll, as provided in Sections 46206 and 46207, the department shall appoint two disinterested persons, who together with the president of the board constitute a board in the nature of a board of equalization which shall be known and designated as the “adjustment board” and whose functions shall be to consider and act upon objections presented as provided in this article to the assessment made by the district engineer. Each of the two appointed members of the board shall be paid as
 compensation for the services rendered by them the sum, or sums, as the department fixes. The president of the board shall be paid as compensation for his or her services rendered the sum, or sums, as the board may fix which shall not exceed the compensation fixed by the department. The compensation and expenses are a part of the cost of the project of the district for which the duties are performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46226.

The adjustment board shall at once organize by the election from its members of a president and a secretary and shall appoint times and places not less than 30 days after the assessment rolls have been filed in the records of the board of directors when and where it will meet within each affected county for the purpose of hearing objections to the assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46227.

Notice of the hearing shall be published at least once a week for two successive weeks in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46230.

The adjustment board may postpone the hearings on objections to assessments from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46231.

At the hearings, the adjustment board shall hear such evidence as may be offered touching the correctness of the assessment, and may modify, amend, or approve the assessment in any particular and may reapportion the whole or any part of it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46232.

No assessment shall be increased if the holder of title to land affected is known except after personal notice or notice by registered mail given to the holder of title by depositing the notice at least two weeks before the hearing in the postoffice at the place in which the office of the district is located, in a sealed postpaid envelope addressed to each of the holders of title at his last known place of residence or business. If the last known place of residence or business of the holder of title is unknown, the notice may be sent to the county seat of the county in which any portion of his land is situated. If the holder of title is unknown, the notice may be given by
 publication at least once a week for two successive weeks in the county in which his assessed land is located. No assessment shall be increased except upon a hearing of objections made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Approval of Assessment Roll [46255. - 46257.]

46255.

After hearing of objections, the adjustment board shall make an order approving the assessment as finally fixed or modified. The apportionment and determination of the adjustment board shall be final and conclusive, and no action or defense shall ever be maintained attacking them in any respect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46256.
